District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.10

Interest and collection on amounts due.

(a)

In any administrative or civil action brought under this chapter, the Mayor or court shall award interest on all amounts due and unpaid at the rate of interest specified in § 28-3302(b) or (c).

(b)

The award of any money awarded to an employee under this chapter shall be enforceable by the employee to whom the debt is owed or may be collected by the District on behalf of the employee.

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 11, 61 DCR 11368

History